District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.05

Contracting authority.

(a)

The Mayor may purchase from 1 or more life insurance companies a policy or policies of group life insurance to provide the benefits set forth in § 1-622.07 from a life insurance company licensed to provide life and accidental death and dismemberment insurance under the laws of the District. Any contract under this section shall be in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 2.

(b)

The Mayor may discontinue at any time a policy purchased from a company under subsection (a) of this section.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2205
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-622.04, § 1-622.06, § 1-622.07, § 1-622.09, § 1-622.10, § 1-622.11, § 1-622.12, § 1-622.13, and § 1-622.14.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-623.5.